Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2434
Permit; design and form.

The design and form of the permit to carry a concealed handgun shall be prescribed by the Nebraska State Patrol. The permit shall list the permitholder's name, the permitholder's address, and the expiration date of the permit and contain a photograph of the permitholder.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 8.